Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.150

Rules of director—Mandatory subjects—Personnel administration.

The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1) Certification of names for vacancies;

(2) Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(3) Appointments;

(4) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the director may not authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of the agency;

(5) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter;

(6) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training, and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.

The director shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining to affirmative action.

Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for local administration and management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by the director.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 409. Prior: 2002 c 371 s 906; 2002 c 354 s 203; 2002 c 354 s 202; 2002 c 110 s 1; 1999 c 297 s 3; 1996 c 319 s 2; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 911; prior: 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 913; 1993 c 281 s 27; 1990 c 60 s 103; prior: 1985 c 461 s 2; 1985 c 365 s 5; 1983 1st ex.s. c 75 s 5; 1982 1st ex.s. c 53 s 4; prior: 1982 c 79 s 1; 1981 c 311 s 18; 1980 c 118 s 3; 1979 c 151 s 57; 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 75 s 1; 1973 c 154 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 19 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 13; 1961 c 1 s 15 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Findings—1999 c 297: See note following RCW 43.03.125.

Severability—Effective date—1995 2nd sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 19.118.110.

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—Subheadings not law—1990 c 60: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 53: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Severability—1980 c 118: See note following RCW 41.06.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 152: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 14.]

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 75: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect midnight June 6, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 75 s 3.]

Leave for public employees

military: RCW 38.40.060.

vacation: RCW 43.01.040.

Public employees' collective bargaining: Chapter 41.56 RCW.